main/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-poss-pre
 @U.POSS.1SG@:@U.POSS.1SG@%{n%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@:@U.POSS.2SG@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.3SG@:@U.POSS.3SG@%{o%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.1IN@:@U.POSS.1IN@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.1EX@:@U.POSS.1EX@%{n%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@:@U.POSS.2PL@%{k%}^ N ;
 @U.POSS.3PL@:@U.POSS.3PL@%{o%}^ N ;


LEXICON N
 @R.PREQ.F@ N-preq-f ;
 @R.PREQ.T@ N-preq-t ;

LEXICON N-preq-f
 ineni                N-anim ; ! man
 niicaap              N-anim ; ! doll
 asamaakaah           N-anim ; ! soldier
 methoon              N-inan ; ! boat
 @P.EM.T@koohkoos     N-anim ; ! pig
 eenikw               N-anim ; ! ant
 moopi                N-anim ; ! automobile
 ahkohkw              N-anim ; ! bucket
 miin                 N-anim ; ! berry
 sekwaahkw            N-anim ; ! cedar tree
 anaakw               N-anim ; ! star
 atheny               N-inan ; ! stone
 ooteen               N-inan ; ! town
 saethien             N-inan ; ! hunger
 maateth              N-inan ; ! knife
 oteemin              N-inan ; ! strawberry
 mehtekw              N-inan ; ! tree, stick
 kiisekw              N-inan ; ! sky
 paas                 N-anim ; ! bus
 mehtotheeni          N-anim ; ! Native American
 kiisethw             N-anim ; ! sun, moon, month
 saapwahkiih          N-inan ; ! street
 @P.EM.T@sooniaah     N-inan ; ! money

LEXICON N-preq-t
 -ky        N-anim ; ! mother
 -nehk      N-inan ; ! hand
 -hci       N-anim ; ! arm
 -iihkaan   N-anim ; ! friend
 -ooth      N-anim ; ! father

LEXICON N-anim
 @U.ANIM.T@ N-iposs ;

LEXICON N-inan
 @U.ANIM.F@ N-iposs ;

LEXICON N-iposs
 @R.EM.T@@D.POSS.NONE@%<poss%>:@R.EM.T@@D.POSS.NONE@%{e%}m N-poss-post ;
 @D.EM@@D.POSS.NONE@%<poss%>:@D.EM@@D.POSS.NONE@           N-poss-post ;
 @R.POSS.NONE@ N-suff ;

LEXICON N-poss-post
 @U.POSS.1SG@%<1%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.1SG@             N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.2SG@%<2%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.2SG@             N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.3SG@%<3%>%<sg%>:@U.POSS.3SG@             N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.1IN@%<1%>%<incl%>:@U.POSS.1IN@^%{e%}naan N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.1EX@%<1%>%<excl%>:@U.POSS.1EX@^%{e%}naan N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.2PL@%<2%>%<pl%>:@U.POSS.2PL@^%{w%}a      N-suff ;
 @U.POSS.3PL@%<3%>%<pl%>:@U.POSS.3PL@^%{w%}a      N-suff ;

LEXICON N-suff
 @U.ANIM.T@ N-suff-anim   ;
 @U.ANIM.F@ N-suff-inan ;
 %<loc%>:^%{e%}ki  # ;
 %<attr%>:^i # ; ! TODO redirect correctly instead of ending word
 %<prep%>:^e       # ;

LEXICON N-suff-anim
 @D.POSS.3SG@@D.POSS.3PL@%<sg%>%<prox%>:@D.POSS.3SG@@D.POSS.3PL@^a # ;
 %<sg%>%<obv%>:^%{a%}ni # ;
 @R.POSS.1SG@%<sg%>%<voc%>:@R.POSS.1SG@^%{voce%} # ;
 @R.POSS.NONE@%<sg%>%<voc%>:@R.POSS.NONE@^%{voce%} # ;
 @D.POSS.3SG@@D.POSS.3PL@%<pl%>%<prox%>:@D.POSS.3SG@@D.POSS.3PL@^%{a%}ki # ;
 %<pl%>%<obv%>:^%{a%}hi # ;
 @R.POSS.1SG@%<pl%>%<voc%>:@R.POSS.1SG@^%{e%}tike # ;
 @R.POSS.NONE@%<pl%>%<voc%>:@R.POSS.NONE@^%{e%}tike # ;

LEXICON N-suff-inan
 %<sg%>:^i   # ;
 %<pl%>:^ani # ;
